Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-735
Defective incorporation; correction; effect.

In the event any corporation has filed defective articles of incorporation, or has failed to do all things necessary to perfect its corporate organization, it may, nevertheless, file corrected articles of incorporation or amend the original articles, and do and perform all acts and things necessary in the premises for the correction of such defects. The action so taken shall be valid and binding upon all persons concerned, and the capacity of such corporation to file corrected articles of incorporation or amendments to the original articles, or to do and perform all acts and things necessary in the premises, shall not be questioned.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 31, p. 213;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-831;

R.S.1943, § 70-735.